District of Columbia statutes.
47-2025

Repealed

Examination of records and witnesses.

Repealed.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 122, ch. 146, title I, § 145
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 573, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(52)
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 223, 29 DCR 2418
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(ii)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-2025.
1973 Ed., § 47-2622.
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”